Maryland, session 2025, SB1021.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
[5–505.
(a) An action may be brought in accordance with the Maryland Rules and a court
may pass a judgment for sale of a burial ground for another purpose if:
(1) the ground has been dedicated and used for burial;
(2) burial lots have been sold in the burial ground and deeds executed or
certificates issued to buyers of the lots;
(3) the ground has ceased to be used for burial; and
(4) it is desirable to dispose of the burial ground for another purpose.
(b) If the court is satisfied that it is expedient or would be in the interest of the
parties to sell the burial ground, the court:
(1) may pass a judgment for the sale of the burial ground on the terms and
notice the court sets;
(2) shall order that as much of the proceeds of the sale as necessary be used
to pay the expenses of removing any human remains in the burial ground, buying burial
lots in another burial ground, and reburying the remains; and
(3) shall distribute the remaining proceeds of the sale among the parties
according to their interests.
(c) A judgment for the sale of a burial ground passes to the buyer of the burial
ground the title to the burial ground free of the claims of:
(1) the owners of the burial ground; and
(2) the holders of burial lots.]
5–505.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “CEMETERY OWNER” MEANS:
(1) A REGISTERED CEMETERIAN;
(2) A PERMIT HOLDER UNDER SUBTITLE 4 OF THIS TITLE; OR

SENATE BILL 1021 3
(3) AN OWNER OF A CEMETERY THAT IS EXEMPT FROM THE
REGISTRATION AND PERMITTING REQUIREMENTS UNDER § 5–102 OF THIS TITLE.
(B) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN SUBSECTIONS (G) AND (H) OF THIS
SECTION, THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A RELIGIOUS ORGANIZATION THAT IS
A CEMETERY OWNER.
(C) (1) A REGISTERED CEMETERIAN OR PERMIT HOLDER MAY NOT SELL
OR TRANSFER A CEMETERY, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, TO ANOTHER PERSON FOR A USE
OTHER THAN AS A CEMETERY WITHOUT THE APPROVAL OF THE DIRECTOR.
(2) THE OWNER OF A CEMETERY THAT IS EXEMPT FROM THE
REGISTRATION AND PERMITTING REQUIREMENTS UNDER § 5–102 OF THIS TITLE
MAY NOT SELL OR TRANSFER THE CEMETERY, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, TO ANOTHER
PERSON WITHOUT THE APPROVAL OF THE DIRECTOR.
(C) (D) BEFORE APPROVING THE SALE OR TRANSFER OF A CEMETERY
UNDER THIS SECTION, THE DIRECTOR SHALL:
(1) REQUIRE A CEMETERY OWNER TO SUBMIT TO THE DIRECTOR:
(I) AN APPLICATION UNDER SUBSECTION (D) (E) OF THIS
SECTION;
(II) A COMPLETED PRESERVATION PLAN UNDER SUBSECTION
(E) (F) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(III) SATISFACTORY EVIDENCE OF COMPLETION OF THE PUBLIC
NOTICE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBSECTION (F) (H) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) REVIEW AND CONSIDER ANY PUBLIC COMMENTS REGARDING THE
CEMETERY IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (G) (I) OF THIS SECTION.
(D) (E) (1) TO REQUEST APPROVAL TO SELL OR TRANSFER A
CEMETERY UNDER SUBSECTION (B) (C) OF THIS SECTION, A CEMETERY OWNER
SHALL SUBMIT AN APPLICATION TO THE DIRECTOR ON THE FORM THAT THE
DIRECTOR PROVIDES.
(2) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUIRED ON AN
APPLICATION FORM, THE FORM SHALL REQUIRE:
(I) THE NAME AND ADDRESS OF EACH CEMETERY OWNER;

SENATE BILL 1021
(II) NOTICE OF THE INTENT TO SELL OR TRANSFER THE
CEMETERY, IN WHOLE OR IN PART;
(III) A DESCRIPTION OF THE CEMETERY OR PART OF THE
CEMETERY INTENDED FOR SALE OR TRANSFER, INCLUDING THE NAME, LOCATION,
SIZE, ESTIMATED NUMBER OF HUMAN REMAINS AND PET REMAINS INTERRED IN THE
CEMETERY, AND NUMBER OF UNUSED OR UNSOLD BURIAL SITES;
(IV) THE NAME AND CONTACT INFORMATION OF ANY POTENTIAL
BUYERS OR TRANSFEREES OF THE CEMETERY, IF KNOWN;
(V) AN AGREEMENT TO SUBMIT A PRESERVATION PLAN IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (E) (F) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(VI) A COPY OF THE PUBLIC NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (F) (H) OF THIS SECTION.
(E) (F) (1) A CEMETERY OWNER SHALL, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
DIRECTOR, DEVELOP A PRESERVATION PLAN FOR A CEMETERY THAT THE
CEMETERY OWNER INTENDS TO SELL OR TRANSFER.
(2) IN DEVELOPING THE PRESERVATION PLAN UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE CEMETERY OWNER SHALL COMPLY WITH SUBSECTION
(G) OF THIS SECTION.
(G) EACH CEMETERY OWNER, INCLUDING A RELIGIOUS ORGANIZATION
THAT IS A CEMETERY OWNER, SHALL ATTEMPT TO IDENTIFY AND CONTACT:
(I) (1) ANY DESCENDENT OR DESCENDENT COMMUNITY
ORGANIZATION OF AN INDIVIDUAL INTERRED IN THE CEMETERY;
(II) (2) ANY INDIVIDUAL OR FAMILY WHO HAS PURCHASED AN
UNUSED PLOT IN THE CEMETERY; AND
(III) (3) ANY PERSON THAT HAS WORKED TO MAINTAIN THE
ABANDONED CEMETERY.
(F) (H) (1) BEFORE A CEMETERY OWNER, INCLUDING A RELIGIOUS
ORGANIZATION THAT IS A CEMETERY OWNER, MAY SELL OR TRANSFER A CEMETERY
UNDER THIS SECTION, THE CEMETERY OWNER SHALL PROVIDE PUBLIC NOTICE OF
THE CEMETERY OWNER’S INTENT TO SELL OR TRANSFER THE CEMETERY BY:

SENATE BILL 1021 5
(I) PUBLISHING NOTICE OF THE SALE OR TRANSFER IN A
NEWSPAPER OF GENERAL CIRCULATION IN THE COUNTY WHERE THE CEMETERY IS
LOCATED FOR 9 SUCCESSIVE WEEKS;
(II) PLACING A WRITTEN NOTICE OF INTENT TO SELL OR
TRANSFER IN THE CEMETERY AT A CONSPICUOUS LOCATION IN FULL PUBLIC VIEW
FOR NOT LESS THAN 60 DAYS;
(III) PROVIDING NOTICE TO LOCAL GENEALOGICAL AND
HISTORICAL SOCIETIES; AND
(IV) HOLDING A PUBLIC MEETING AT WHICH PUBLIC TESTIMONY
MUST BE OFFERED.
(2) A PUBLIC NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE ADDRESS OF THE CEMETERY;
(II) THE ESTIMATED SIZE AND NUMBER OF HUMAN REMAINS OR
PET REMAINS INTERRED IN THE CEMETERY;
(III) ANY AVAILABLE INFORMATION ABOUT THE CEMETERY
FROM THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF ASSESSMENTS AND TAXATION; AND
(IV) IF AVAILABLE, THE NAME OF THE LAST KNOWN OWNER OF
THE CEMETERY.
(G) (I) BEFORE APPROVING THE SALE OR TRANSFER OF A CEMETERY
UNDER THIS SECTION, THE DIRECTOR SHALL CONSIDER ANY PUBLIC COMMENTS
ABOUT THE CEMETERY RECEIVED BY THE CEMETERY OWNER AT A PUBLIC HEARING
UNDER SUBSECTION (F)(1)(IV) (H)(1)(IV) OF THIS SECTION OR BY THE DIRECTOR,
INCLUDING:
(1) WHETHER THE CEMETERY OWNER HAS CONSIDERED THE
CONCERNS OF THE DESCENDANT COMMUNITY, INCLUDING:
(I) REASONS FOR THE PROPOSED SALE OR TRANSFER AND
FUTURE PLANS FOR THE PROPERTY;
(II) WHETHER THE CURRENT LOCATION OF THE CEMETERY
HOLDS ANY CULTURAL OR HISTORICAL SIGNIFICANCE;

SENATE BILL 1021
(III) THE COST OF DISINTERMENT AND REINTERMENT OF THE
HUMAN REMAINS OR PET REMAINS IN THE CEMETERY AND WHO SHOULD BEAR THE
COST; AND
(IV) WHERE ANY HUMAN REMAINS OR PET REMAINS
DISINTERRED FROM THE CEMETERY WOULD BE RELOCATED; AND
(2) WHETHER THE CEMETERY OWNER RECEIVED OTHER EQUIVALENT
OFFERS FOR PURCHASE OF THE CEMETERY THAT MAY BE LESS DISRUPTIVE TO THE
CEMETERY.
(H) (J) THE DIRECTOR SHALL APPROVE THE SALE OR TRANSFER OF A
CEMETERY OR PART OF A CEMETERY UNDER THIS SECTION IF:
(1) THE CEMETERY OWNER SATISFIES ALL THE REQUIREMENTS OF
THIS SECTION; AND
(2) THE DIRECTOR DETERMINES THAT IT IS IN THE INTEREST OF ALL
THE PARTIES TO SELL OR TRANSFER THE CEMETERY OR PART OF THE CEMETERY.
(K) AN ACTION MAY BE BROUGHT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE MARYLAND
RULES AND A COURT MAY PASS JUDGMENT REGARDING THE SALE OF A BURIAL
GROUND FOR ANOTHER PURPOSE IF ANY PARTY DISPUTES THE DIRECTOR’S
DECISION UNDER SUBSECTION (J) OF THIS SECTION.
5–507.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “ABANDONED CEMETERY” MEANS A CEMETERY FOR
WHICH:
(1) LEGAL OWNERSHIP CANNOT BE DETERMINED;
(2) THE PERSON WITH LEGAL RESPONSIBILITY FOR OPERATION AND
MAINTENANCE OF THE CEMETERY CANNOT BE DETERMINED;
(3) THE ENTITY THAT OPERATED THE CEMETERY HAS CEASED TO
OPERATE; OR
(4) THE REAL PROPERTY ON WHICH THE CEMETERY IS LOCATED HAS
BEEN CONDEMNED.
(B) (1) THE STATE, A COUNTY, OR A MUNICIPALITY MAY ACQUIRE AN
ABANDONED CEMETERY, INCLUDING OWNERSHIP OF ANY UNOCCUPIED LOTS OR
BURIAL SITES, FOR THE PURPOSE OF TRANSFERRING OWNERSHIP OF THE

SENATE BILL 1021 7
ABANDONED CEMETERY TO A DESCENDANT COMMUNITY ORGANIZATION OR A
NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION.
(2) A DESCENDENT COMMUNITY ORGANIZATION OR NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION THAT AGREES TO THE TRANSFER OF TITLE OF A CEMETERY UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL AGREE TO PROPERLY MAINTAIN,
PRESERVE, AND PROTECT THE CEMETERY.
(C) IF A GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY THAT HAS ACQUIRED AN ABANDONED
CEMETERY UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION IS UNABLE TO TRANSFER
OWNERSHIP OF THE ABANDONED CEMETERY WITHIN A REASONABLE PERIOD OF
TIME, THE DIRECTOR MAY FACILITATE THE REINTERMENT OF ANY HUMAN REMAINS
OR PET REMAINS FROM THE ABANDONED CEMETERY TO AN OPERATIONAL
CEMETERY IN A PROFESSIONAL MANNER.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.